Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB669.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 908.1(c) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 908.1. Use or possession of electric or electronic incapacitation device.* * *(c) Prohibited possession.--No person prohibited from possessing a firearm pursuant to section 6105 (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 transfer firearms and ammunition) may possess or use an electric or electronic incapacitation device.* * *Section 2. Section 6102 of Title 18 is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 6102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this subchapter which are applicable to specific provisions of this subchapter, the following words and phrases, when used in this subchapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:"Ammunition." A loaded cartridge with one or more projectiles that consists of a primed case and propellant. The term does not include blanks.* * *"Gun range or target facility." Any of the following: (1) An enclosed or open-air firing range or area designed and operated for the use of rifle or handgun practice with targets.(2) A facility that permits the rental of firearms for use on the facility's property and is authorized to operate in such a manner by the governing body of the jurisdiction where the facility is located.* * *"Other weapon." Anything readily capable of lethal use and possessed under circumstances not manifestly lawful. The term does not include a firearm.* * *Section 3. Sections 6103, 6104, 6105 heading, (a), (c), (d), 20250SB0669PN1276 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f)(1) and (h), 6105.1(a)(1), 6105.2(a)(1), 6109(d)(4) and (5) and (m.1)(1)(ii) and 6110.2(c) of Title 18 are amended to read:§ 6103. Crimes committed with firearms.If any person commits or attempts to commit a crime enumerated in section 6105 (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms and ammunition) when armed with a firearm contrary to the provisions of this subchapter, that person may, in addition to the punishment provided for the crime, also be punished as provided by this subchapter.§ 6104. Evidence of intent.In the trial of a person for committing or attempting to commit a crime enumerated in section 6105 (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms and ammunition), the fact that that person was armed with a firearm, used or attempted to be used, and had no license to carry the same, shall be evidence of that person's intention to commit the offense.§ 6105. Persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms and ammunition.(a) Offense defined.--(1) A person who has been convicted of an offense enumerated in subsection (b), within or without this Commonwealth, regardless of the length of sentence or whose conduct meets the criteria in subsection (c) shall not possess, use, control, sell, transfer or manufacture or obtain a license to possess, use, control, sell, transfer or manufacture a firearm or ammunition in this Commonwealth.(2) (i) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, a person who is prohibited from possessing, using, 20250SB0669PN1276 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 controlling, selling, transferring or manufacturing a firearm or ammunition under paragraph (1) or subsection (b) or (c) shall have a reasonable period of time, not to exceed 60 days from the date of the imposition of the disability under this subsection, in which to sell or transfer that person's firearms or ammunition to another eligible person who is not a member of the prohibited person's household.(ii) This paragraph shall not apply to any person whose disability is imposed pursuant to subsection (c)(6).(iii) A person whose disability is imposed pursuant to subsection (c)(9) shall relinquish any firearms and firearm licenses under that person's possession or control, as described in section 6105.2 (relating to relinquishment of firearms and firearm licenses by convicted persons).(iv) A person whose disability is imposed pursuant to a protection from abuse order shall relinquish any firearms, other weapons, ammunition and firearm licenses under that person's possession or control, as described in 23 Pa.C.S. § 6108(a)(7) (relating to relief).* * *(c) Other persons.--In addition to any person who has been convicted of any offense listed under subsection (b), the following persons shall be subject to the prohibition of subsection (a):(1) A person who is a fugitive from justice. This paragraph does not apply to an individual whose fugitive status is based upon a nonmoving or moving summary offense 20250SB0669PN1276 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under Title 75 (relating to vehicles).(2) A person who has been convicted of an offense under the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, or any equivalent Federal statute or equivalent statute of any other state, that may be punishable by a term of imprisonment exceeding two years.(3) A person who has been convicted of driving under the influence of alcohol or controlled substance as provided in 75 Pa.C.S. § 3802 (relating to driving under influence of alcohol or controlled substance) or the former 75 Pa.C.S. § 3731, on three or more separate occasions within a five-year period. For the purposes of this paragraph only, the prohibition of subsection (a) shall only apply to transfers or purchases of firearms or ammunition after the third conviction.(4) A person who has been adjudicated as an incompetent or who has been involuntarily committed to a mental institution for inpatient care and treatment under section 302, 303 or 304 of the provisions of the act of July 9, 1976 (P.L.817, No.143), known as the Mental Health Procedures Act. This paragraph shall not apply to any proceeding under section 302 of the Mental Health Procedures Act unless the examining physician has issued a certification that inpatient care was necessary or that the person was committable.(5) A person who, being an alien, is illegally or unlawfully in the United States.(6) A person who is the subject of an active final protection from abuse order issued pursuant to 23 Pa.C.S. § 6108, is the subject of any other active protection from 20250SB0669PN1276 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 abuse order issued pursuant to 23 Pa.C.S. § 6107(b), which provided for the relinquishment of firearms, other weapons or ammunition during the period of time the order is in effect or is otherwise prohibited from possessing or acquiring a firearm under 18 U.S.C. § 922(g)(8). This prohibition shall terminate upon the expiration or vacation of the order or portion thereof relating to the relinquishment of firearms, other weapons or ammunition.(7) A person who was adjudicated delinquent by a court pursuant to 42 Pa.C.S. § 6341 (relating to adjudication) or under any equivalent Federal statute or statute of any other state as a result of conduct which if committed by an adult would constitute an offense under sections 2502, 2503, 2702, 2703 (relating to assault by prisoner), 2704, 2901, 3121, 3123, 3301, 3502, 3701 and 3923.(8) A person who was adjudicated delinquent by a court pursuant to 42 Pa.C.S. § 6341 or under any equivalent Federal statute or statute of any other state as a result of conduct which if committed by an adult would constitute an offense enumerated in subsection (b) with the exception of those crimes set forth in paragraph (7). This prohibition shall terminate 15 years after the last applicable delinquent adjudication or upon the person reaching the age of 30, whichever is earlier.(9) A person who is prohibited from possessing or acquiring a firearm under 18 U.S.C. § 922(g)(9). If the offense which resulted in the prohibition under 18 U.S.C. § 922(g)(9) was committed, as provided in 18 U.S.C. § 921(a)(33)(A)(ii) (relating to definitions), by a person in any of the following relationships:20250SB0669PN1276 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) the current or former spouse, parent or guardian of the victim;(ii) a person with whom the victim shares a child in common;(iii) a person who cohabits with or has cohabited with the victim as a spouse, parent or guardian; or(iv) a person similarly situated to a spouse, parent or guardian of the victim;then the relationship need not be an element of the offense to meet the requirements of this paragraph.(10) A person who has been convicted of an offense under subsection (a.1)(2). The prohibition shall terminate five years after the date of conviction, final release from confinement or final release from supervision, whichever is later.(d) Exemption.--A person who has been convicted of a crime specified in subsection (a) or (b) or a person whose conduct meets the criteria in subsection (c)(1), (2), (5), (7) or (9) may make application to the court of common pleas of the county where the principal residence of the applicant is situated for relief from the disability imposed by this section upon the possession, transfer or control of a firearm and ammunition. The court shall grant such relief if it determines that any of the following apply:(1) The conviction has been vacated under circumstances where all appeals have been exhausted or where the right to appeal has expired.(2) The conviction has been the subject of a full pardon by the Governor.(3) Each of the following conditions is met:20250SB0669PN1276 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) The Secretary of the Treasury of the United States has relieved the applicant of an applicable disability imposed by Federal law upon the possession, ownership or control of a firearm as a result of the applicant's prior conviction, except that the court may waive this condition if the court determines that the Congress of the United States has not appropriated sufficient funds to enable the Secretary of the Treasury to grant relief to applicants eligible for the relief.(ii) A period of ten years, not including any time spent in incarceration, has elapsed since the most recent conviction of the applicant of a crime enumerated in subsection (b), a felony violation of The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act or the offense which resulted in the prohibition under 18 U.S.C. § 922(g)(9).* * *(f) Other exemptions and proceedings.--(1) Upon application to the court of common pleas under this subsection by an applicant subject to the prohibitions under subsection (c)(4), the court may grant such relief as it deems appropriate if the court determines that the applicant may possess a firearm and ammunition without risk to the applicant or any other person.* * *(h) License prohibition.--Any person who is prohibited from possessing, using, controlling, selling, purchasing, transferring or manufacturing any firearm and ammunition under this section shall not be eligible for or permitted to obtain a license to carry a firearm under section 6109 (relating to 20250SB0669PN1276 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 licenses).* * *§ 6105.1. Restoration of firearm rights for offenses under prior laws of this Commonwealth.(a) Restoration.--A person convicted of a disabling offense may make application to the court of common pleas in the county where the principal residence of the applicant is situated for restoration of firearms rights. The court shall grant restoration of firearms rights after a hearing in open court to determine whether the requirements of this section have been met unless:(1) the applicant has been convicted of any other offense specified in section 6105(a) or (b) (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms and ammunition) or the applicant's conduct meets the criteria in section 6105(c)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6) or (7);* * *§ 6105.2. Relinquishment of firearms and firearm licenses by convicted persons.(a) Procedure.--(1) A person subject to a firearms disability pursuant to section 6105(c)(9) (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms and ammunition) shall relinquish any firearms under the person's possession or control to the appropriate law enforcement agency of the municipality as described in subsection (b) or to a dealer as described in subsection (c).* * *§ 6109. Licenses.20250SB0669PN1276 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(d) Sheriff to conduct investigation.--The sheriff to whom the application is made shall:* * *(4) investigate whether the applicant would be precluded from receiving a license under subsection (e)(1) or section 6105(h) (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms and ammunition); and(5) conduct a criminal background, juvenile delinquency and mental health check following the procedures set forth in section 6111 (relating to sale or transfer of firearms or ammunition), receive a unique approval number for that inquiry and record the date and number on the application.* * *(m.1) Temporary emergency licenses.--(1) A person seeking a temporary emergency license to carry a concealed firearm shall submit to the sheriff of the county in which the person resides all of the following:* * *(ii) A sworn affidavit that contains the information required on an application for a license to carry a firearm and attesting that the person is 21 years of age or older, is not prohibited from owning firearms under section 6105 [(relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms)] or any other Federal or State law and is not currently subject to a protection from abuse order or a protection order issued by a court of another state.* * *20250SB0669PN1276 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 6110.2. Possession of firearm with altered manufacturer's number.* * *(c) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "firearm" shall have the same meaning as that term is defined in section 6105(i) (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms and ammunition), except that the term shall not include antique firearms as defined in section 6118 (relating to antique firearms).Section 4. Section 6111 heading, (b) introductory paragraph, (1.1)(v), (1.2) and (6), (c), (f), (g), (h)(1) and (j) of Title 18 are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 6111. Sale or transfer of firearms or ammunition.* * *(b) Duty of seller.--No licensed importer, licensed manufacturer or licensed dealer shall sell or deliver any firearm or ammunition to another person, other than a licensed importer, licensed manufacturer, licensed dealer [or], licensed collector, gun range or target facility or, in the case of ammunition, a person who purchases or receives the ammunition at a gun range or target facility if the ammunition is kept within the facility's premises at all times, until the conditions of subsection (a) have been satisfied and until he has:* * *(1.1) On the date of publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin of a notice by the Pennsylvania State Police that the instantaneous records check has been implemented, all of the following shall apply:* * *20250SB0669PN1276 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) Unless it has been discovered pursuant to a criminal history, juvenile delinquency and mental health records background check that the potential purchaser or transferee is prohibited from possessing a firearm and ammunition pursuant to section 6105 (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms and ammunition), no information on the application/record of sale provided pursuant to this subsection shall be retained as precluded by section 6111.4 (relating to registration of firearms) by the Pennsylvania State Police either through retention of the application/record of sale or by entering the information onto a computer, and, further, an application/record of sale received by the Pennsylvania State Police pursuant to this subsection shall be destroyed within 72 hours of the completion of the criminal history, juvenile delinquency and mental health records background check.(1.2) Fees collected under paragraph (3) and section 6111.2 (relating to firearm and ammunition sales surcharge) shall be transmitted to the Pennsylvania State Police within 14 days of collection.* * *(6) Unless it has been discovered pursuant to a criminal history, juvenile delinquency and mental health records background check that the potential purchaser or transferee is prohibited from possessing a firearm and ammunition pursuant to section 6105, no information received via telephone following the implementation of the instantaneous background check system from a purchaser or transferee who has received a unique approval number shall be retained by 20250SB0669PN1276 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Pennsylvania State Police.* * *(b.1) Remote ordering.--(1) Except for the sale, delivery or transfer of firearms by gun ranges or target facilities and as otherwise provided in paragraph (2), the sale, delivery or transfer of firearms or ammunition by a licensed importer, licensed manufacturer or licensed dealer to a purchaser or transferee other than another licensed importer, licensed manufacturer or licensed dealer may only occur in a face-to-face transaction with the licensed importer, licensed manufacturer or licensed dealer being provided bona fide evidence of identity from the purchaser or other transferee.(2) Firearms or ammunition may be purchased over the Internet or through other means of remote ordering if a licensed importer, licensed manufacturer or licensed dealer in this Commonwealth initially receives the firearm or ammunition and processes the transfer in compliance with this section.(c) Duty of other persons.--Any person who is not a licensed importer, manufacturer or dealer and who desires to sell or transfer a firearm or ammunition to another unlicensed person shall do so only upon the place of business of a licensed importer, manufacturer, dealer or county sheriff's office, the latter of whom shall follow the procedure set forth in this section as if he were the seller of the firearm or ammunition. The provisions of this section shall not apply to transfers between spouses or to transfers between a parent and child or to transfers between grandparent and grandchild or to transfers between siblings.20250SB0669PN1276 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(f) Application of section.--(1) For the purposes of this section only, except as provided by paragraph (2), "firearm" shall mean any weapon which is designed to or may readily be converted to expel any projectile by the action of an explosive or the frame or receiver of any such weapon.(2) The provisions contained in subsections (a), (b.1) and (c) shall only apply to [pistols or revolvers] a firearm if the firearm is a pistol or revolver with a barrel length of less than 15 inches, [any] a shotgun with a barrel length of less than 18 inches, [any] a rifle with a barrel length of less than 16 inches or [any] a firearm with an overall length of less than 26 inches.(3) The provisions contained in subsection (a) shall not apply to any law enforcement officer whose current identification as a law enforcement officer shall be construed as a valid license to carry a firearm or any person who possesses a valid license to carry a firearm under section 6109 (relating to licenses).(4) (i) The provisions of subsection (a) shall not apply to any person who presents to the seller or transferor a written statement issued by the official described in subparagraph (iii) during the ten-day period ending on the date of the most recent proposal of such transfer or sale by the transferee or purchaser stating that the transferee or purchaser requires access to a firearm and ammunition because of a threat to the life of the transferee or purchaser or any member of the household of that transferee or purchaser.20250SB0669PN1276 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) The issuing official shall notify the applicant's local police authority that such a statement has been issued. In counties of the first class the chief of police shall notify the police station or substation closest to the applicant's residence.(iii) The statement issued under subparagraph (ii) shall be issued by the district attorney, or his designee, of the county of residence if the transferee or purchaser resides in a municipality where there is no chief of police. Otherwise, the statement shall be issued by the chief of police in the municipality in which the purchaser or transferee resides.(g) Penalties.--(1) Any person, licensed dealer, licensed manufacturer or licensed importer who knowingly or intentionally sells, delivers or transfers a firearm or ammunition in violation of this section commits a misdemeanor of the second degree.(2) Any person, licensed dealer, licensed manufacturer or licensed importer who knowingly or intentionally sells, delivers or transfers a firearm or ammunition under circumstances intended to provide a firearm or ammunition to any person, purchaser or transferee who is unqualified or ineligible to control, possess or use a firearm or ammunition under this chapter commits a felony of the third degree and shall in addition be subject to revocation of the license to sell firearms and ammunition for a period of three years.(3) Any person, licensed dealer, licensed manufacturer or licensed importer who knowingly and intentionally requests a criminal history, juvenile delinquency or mental health record check or other confidential information from the 20250SB0669PN1276 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pennsylvania State Police under this chapter for any purpose other than compliance with this chapter or knowingly and intentionally disseminates any criminal history, juvenile delinquency or mental health record or other confidential information to any person other than the subject of the information commits a felony of the third degree.(3.1) Any person, licensed dealer, licensed manufacturer or licensed importer who knowingly and intentionally obtains or furnishes information collected or maintained pursuant to section 6109 for any purpose other than compliance with this chapter or who knowingly or intentionally disseminates, publishes or otherwise makes available such information to any person other than the subject of the information commits a felony of the third degree.(4) Any person, purchaser or transferee commits a felony of the third degree if, in connection with the purchase, delivery or transfer of a firearm or ammunition under this chapter, he knowingly and intentionally:(i) makes any materially false oral statement;(ii) makes any materially false written statement, including a statement on any form promulgated by Federal or State agencies; or(iii) willfully furnishes or exhibits any false identification intended or likely to deceive the seller, licensed dealer or licensed manufacturer.(5) Notwithstanding section 306 (relating to liability for conduct of another; complicity) or any other statute to the contrary, any person, licensed importer, licensed dealer or licensed manufacturer who knowingly and intentionally sells, delivers or transfers a firearm or ammunition in 20250SB0669PN1276 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 violation of this chapter who has reason to believe that the firearm or ammunition is intended to be used in the commission of a crime or attempt to commit a crime shall be criminally liable for such crime or attempted crime.(6) Notwithstanding any act or statute to the contrary, any person, licensed importer, licensed manufacturer or licensed dealer who knowingly and intentionally sells or delivers a firearm or ammunition in violation of this chapter who has reason to believe that the firearm or ammunition is intended to be used in the commission of a crime or attempt to commit a crime shall be liable in the amount of the civil judgment for injuries suffered by any person so injured by such crime or attempted crime.(h) Subsequent violation penalty.--(1) A second or subsequent violation of this section shall be a felony of the second degree. A person who at the time of sentencing has been convicted of another offense under this section shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum sentence of imprisonment of five years. A second or subsequent offense shall also result in permanent revocation of any license to sell, import or manufacture a firearm and ammunition.* * *(j) Exemption.--(1) The provisions of subsections (a) and (b) shall not apply to:(i) sales between Federal firearms licensees; or(ii) the purchase of firearms or ammunition by a chief law enforcement officer or his designee, for the official use of law enforcement officers.20250SB0669PN1276 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) For the purposes of this subsection, the term "chief law enforcement officer" shall include the Commissioner of the Pennsylvania State Police, the chief or head of a police department, a county sheriff or any equivalent law enforcement official.Section 5. Sections 6111.1(b), (e)(1), (f)(1), (i), (j.3) and (k), 6111.2 heading, (a) and (c), 6111.3, 6112, 6113(a), 6115(b)(1)(iv)(B)(II), 6117(a) and 6118(b) of Title 18 are amended to read:§ 6111.1. Pennsylvania State Police.* * *(b) Duty of Pennsylvania State Police.--(1) Upon receipt of a request for a criminal history, juvenile delinquency history and mental health record check of the potential purchaser or transferee, the Pennsylvania State Police shall immediately during the licensee's call or by return call forthwith:(i) review the Pennsylvania State Police criminal history and fingerprint records to determine if the potential purchaser or transferee is prohibited from receipt or possession of a firearm or ammunition under Federal or State law;(ii) review the juvenile delinquency and mental health records of the Pennsylvania State Police to determine whether the potential purchaser or transferee is prohibited from receipt or possession of a firearm or ammunition under Federal or State law; and(iii) inform the licensee making the inquiry either:(A) that the potential purchase or transfer is prohibited; or20250SB0669PN1276 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) provide the licensee with a unique approval number.(2) In the event of electronic failure, scheduled computer downtime or similar event beyond the control of the Pennsylvania State Police, the Pennsylvania State Police shall immediately notify the requesting licensee of the reason for and estimated length of the delay. If the failure or event lasts for a period exceeding 48 hours, the dealer shall not be subject to any penalty for completing a transaction absent the completion of an instantaneous records check for the remainder of the failure or similar event, but the dealer shall obtain a completed application/record of sale following the provisions of section 6111(b)(1) and (1.1) (relating to sale or transfer of firearms or ammunition) as if an instantaneous records check has not been established for any sale or transfer of a firearm or ammunition for the purpose of a subsequent background check.(3) The Pennsylvania State Police shall fully comply, execute and enforce the directives of this section as follows:(i) The instantaneous background check for firearms as defined in section 6102 (relating to definitions) shall begin on July 1, 1998.(ii) The instantaneous background check for firearms that exceed the barrel lengths set forth in section 6102 shall begin on the later of:(A) the date of publication of the notice under section 6111(a)(2); or(B) December 31, 1998.(4) The Pennsylvania State Police and any local law 20250SB0669PN1276 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enforcement agency shall make all reasonable efforts to determine the lawful owner of any firearm confiscated or recovered by the Pennsylvania State Police or any local law enforcement agency and return said firearm to its lawful owner if the owner is not otherwise prohibited from possessing the firearm. When a court of law has determined that the Pennsylvania State Police or any local law enforcement agency have failed to exercise the duty under this subsection, reasonable attorney fees shall be awarded to any lawful owner of said firearm who has sought judicial enforcement of this subsection.* * *(e) Challenge to records.--(1) Any person who is denied the right to receive, sell, transfer, possess, carry, manufacture or purchase a firearm or ammunition as a result of the procedures established by this section may challenge the accuracy of that person's criminal history, juvenile delinquency history or mental health record pursuant to a denial by the instantaneous records check by submitting a challenge to the Pennsylvania State Police within 30 days from the date of the denial.* * *(f) Notification of mental health adjudication, treatment, commitment, drug use or addiction.--(1) Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, judges of the courts of common pleas shall notify the Pennsylvania State Police, on a form developed by the Pennsylvania State Police, of:(i) the identity of any individual who has been adjudicated as an incompetent or as a mental defective or 20250SB0669PN1276 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 who has been involuntarily committed to a mental institution under the act of July 9, 1976 (P.L.817, No.143), known as the Mental Health Procedures Act, or who has been involuntarily treated as described in section 6105(c)(4) (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms and ammunition) or as described in 18 U.S.C. § 922(g)(4) (relating to unlawful acts) and its implementing Federal regulations; and(ii) any finding of fact or court order related to any person described in 18 U.S.C. § 922(g)(3).* * *(i) Reports.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall annually compile and report to the General Assembly, on or before December 31, the following information for the previous year:(1) number of firearm and ammunition sales, including the types of firearms and ammunition, delineated in a separate manner;(2) number of applications for sale of firearms and ammunition denied, number of challenges of the denials and number of final reversals of initial denials, delineated in a separate manner;(3) summary of the Pennsylvania State Police's activities, including the average time taken to complete a criminal history, juvenile delinquency history or mental health record check; and(4) uniform crime reporting statistics compiled by the Pennsylvania State Police based on the National Incident-based Reporting System.* * *20250SB0669PN1276 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (j.3) Immunity.--The Pennsylvania State Police and its employees shall be immune from actions for damages for the use of a firearm or ammunition by a purchaser or for the unlawful transfer of a firearm or ammunition by a dealer unless the act of the Pennsylvania State Police or its employees constitutes a crime, actual fraud, actual malice or willful misconduct.(k) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Firearm." The term shall have the same meaning as in section 6111.2 (relating to firearm and ammunition sales surcharge)."Physician." Any licensed psychiatrist or clinical psychologist as defined in the act of July 9, 1976 (P.L.817, No.143), known as the Mental Health Procedures Act.§ 6111.2. Firearm and ammunition sales surcharge.(a) Surcharge imposed.--There is hereby imposed on each sale of a firearm or ammunition subject to tax under Article II of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, an additional surcharge of $3. This shall be referred to as the Firearm and Ammunition Sale Surcharge. All moneys received from this surcharge shall be deposited in the Firearm [Instant] Records Check Fund.* * *(c) Revenue sources.--Funds received under the provisions of this section and section 6111(b)(3) (relating to sale or transfer of firearms or ammunition), as estimated and certified by the Secretary of Revenue, shall be deposited within five days of the end of each quarter into the fund.* * *20250SB0669PN1276 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 6111.3. Firearm Records Check Fund.(a) Establishment.--The Firearm Records Check Fund is hereby established as a restricted account in the State Treasury, separate and apart from all other public money or funds of the Commonwealth, to be appropriated annually by the General Assembly, for use in carrying out the provisions of section 6111 (relating to [firearm ownership] sale or transfer of firearms or ammunition). The moneys in the fund on June 1, 1998, are hereby appropriated to the Pennsylvania State Police.(b) Source.--The source of the fund shall be moneys collected and transferred under section 6111.2 (relating to firearm and ammunition sales surcharge) and moneys collected and transferred under section 6111(b)(3).§ 6112. Retail dealer required to be licensed.No retail dealer shall sell, or otherwise transfer or expose for sale or transfer, or have in his possession with intent to sell or transfer, any ammunition or any firearm as defined in section 6113(d) (relating to licensing of dealers) without being licensed as provided in this chapter.§ 6113. Licensing of dealers.(a) General rule.--The chief or head of any police force or police department of a city, and, elsewhere, the sheriff of the county, shall grant to reputable applicants licenses, in form prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police, effective for three years from date of issue, permitting the licensee to sell firearms, ammunition, or both, direct to the consumer, subject to the following conditions in addition to those specified in section 6111 (relating to sale or transfer of firearms or ammunition), for breach of any of which the license shall be forfeited and the licensee subject to punishment as provided in 20250SB0669PN1276 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this subchapter:(1) The business shall be carried on only upon the premises designated in the license or at a lawful gun show or meet.(2) The license, or a copy thereof, certified by the issuing authority, shall be displayed on the premises where it can easily be read.(3) No firearm or ammunition shall be sold in violation of any provision of this subchapter.(4) No firearm or ammunition shall be sold under any circumstances unless the purchaser is personally known to the seller or shall present clear evidence of the purchaser's identity.(5) A true record in triplicate shall be made of every firearm or ammunition sold, in a book kept for the purpose, the form of which may be prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police, and shall be personally signed by the purchaser and by the person effecting the sale, each in the presence of the other, and shall contain the information required by section 6111. The record shall be maintained by the licensee for a period of 20 years.(6) No firearm as defined in section 6102 (relating to definitions) or ammunition shall be displayed in any part of any premises where it can readily be seen from the outside. In the event that the Commissioner of the Pennsylvania State Police shall find a clear and present danger to public safety within this Commonwealth or any area thereof, firearms and ammunition shall be stored and safeguarded pursuant to regulations to be established by the Pennsylvania State Police by the licensee during the hours when the licensee is 20250SB0669PN1276 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 closed for business.(7) The dealer shall possess all applicable current revenue licenses.* * *§ 6115. Loans on, or lending or giving firearms prohibited.* * *(b) Exception.--(1) Subsection (a) shall not apply if any of the following apply:* * *(iv) The person who receives the firearm meets all of the following:* * *(B) Pursuant to section 6110.1 (relating to possession of firearm by minor) is under the supervision, guidance and instruction of a responsible individual who:* * *(II) is not prohibited from owning or possessing a firearm under section 6105 (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms and ammunition).* * *§ 6117. Altering or obliterating marks of identification.(a) Offense defined.--No person shall change, alter, remove, or obliterate the manufacturer's number integral to the frame or receiver of any firearm which shall have the same meaning as provided in section 6105 (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms and 20250SB0669PN1276 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ammunition).* * *§ 6118. Antique firearms.* * *(b) Exception.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to the extent that such antique firearms, reproductions or replicas of firearms are concealed weapons as provided in section 6106 (relating to firearms not be carried without a license), nor shall it apply to the provisions of section 6105 (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms and ammunition) if such antique firearms, reproductions or replicas of firearms are suitable for use.* * *Section 6. Title 18 is amended by adding sections to read:§ 6121.1. Ammunition purchase authorization permits. (a) Use.--A person holding an ammunition purchase authorization permit issued under this section may purchase or otherwise seek the transfer of ownership of ammunition from a retailer that sells ammunition.(b) Validity.--Except as provided under subsection (c), an ammunition purchase authorization permit shall be valid for four years from the date of issuance.(c) Eligibility.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall issue an ammunition purchase authorization permit to a person if all of the following requirements are met:(1) The person submits an application for an ammunition purchase authorization permit as prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police.(2) The person is 18 years of age or older.(3) The person is not prohibited from acquiring or 20250SB0669PN1276 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 possessing ammunition under Federal or State law.(4) The person pays the fee as specified under subsection (g).(d) Approval process.--(1) Upon receipt of an application for an ammunition purchase authorization permit, the Pennsylvania State Police shall examine its records and the Pennsylvania Instant Check System in order to determine if the applicant is prohibited from possessing or acquiring ammunition under Federal or State law.(2) The applicant shall be approved or denied within 30 days of the date of the submission of the application to the department.(3) If the Pennsylvania State Police is unable to make a determination under paragraph (2) within 30 days, the Pennsylvania State Police shall issue the ammunition purchase authorization permit.(4) The Pennsylvania State Police shall renew an ammunition purchase authorization permit before its expiration if the Pennsylvania State Police determines that the holder is not prohibited from acquiring or possessing ammunition under Federal or State law and pays the fee as specified under subsection (g).(e) Revocation.--(1) An ammunition purchase authorization permit shall be revoked by the Pennsylvania State Police if the holder of the ammunition purchase authorization commits an act that would have disqualified the holder from being issued the ammunition purchase authorization permit under this section.(2) If an ammunition purchase authorization permit is 20250SB0669PN1276 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 revoked under paragraph (1), the Pennsylvania State Police shall, upon the written request of the holder and in a manner as prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police, provide the holder with the reasons for the revocation and the process to appeal the revocation.(f) List.--(1) The Pennsylvania State Police shall create and maintain an internal centralized list of all persons who hold an ammunition purchase authorization permit.(2) The Pennsylvania State Police shall remove a person from the list under paragraph (1) whose authorization has been revoked by the Pennsylvania State Police under subsection (e)(1).(3) The Pennsylvania State Police shall provide access to the list under paragraph (1) to the following:(i) Retailers that sell or otherwise seek the transfer of ownership of ammunition.(ii) Law enforcement agencies for purposes of enforcing the law.(g) Fee.--(1) The Pennsylvania State Police may charge a fee not to exceed $50 for the issuance or renewal of an ammunition purchase authorization permit under this section. The fee shall not be greater than the amount necessary to recover the reasonable, estimated costs to administer this section.(2) The Pennsylvania State Police shall annually review and may adjust the fee under paragraph (1) for inflation.(h) Fund established.--The Ammunition Safety and Enforcement Fund is established within the State Treasury. Revenue collected from the fee charged under subsection (g) shall be deposited 20250SB0669PN1276 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 into the Ammunition Safety and Enforcement Fund on a continuing basis for the purpose of administering this section.(i) Identification.--The ammunition purchase authorization permit number shall be the same as the number on the document presented by the applicant as bona fide evidence of identity.(j) Regulations.-- The Pennsylvania State Police may promulgate regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section.§ 6121.2. Transporting ammunition into this Commonwealth. (a) Prohibition.--A resident of this Commonwealth may not transport ammunition into this Commonwealth if the resident purchased or otherwise obtained the ammunition from outside of this Commonwealth and the ammunition has not been delivered to a licensed importer, licensed manufacturer or licensed dealer in this Commonwealth for delivery to the resident in accordance with section 6121.1 (relating to ammunition purchase authorization permits).(b) Applicability.--This section shall not apply to a licensed importer, licensed manufacturer, licensed dealer, law enforcement agency or law enforcement officer or a grandparent, spouse, sibling, child or grandchild of the transferor.Section 7. Sections 6123 and 6301(a)(2) of Title 18 are amended to read:§ 6123. Waiver of disability or pardons.A waiver of disability from Federal authorities as provided for in 18 U.S.C. § 925 (relating to exceptions; relief from disabilities), a full pardon from the Governor or an overturning of a conviction shall remove any corresponding disability under this subchapter except the disability under section 6105 (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, 20250SB0669PN1276 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sell or transfer firearms and ammunition).§ 6301. Corruption of minors.(a) Offense defined.--* * *(2) Any person who knowingly aids, abets, entices or encourages a minor younger than 18 years of age to commit truancy commits a summary offense. Any person who violates this paragraph within one year of the date of a first conviction under this section commits a misdemeanor of the third degree. A conviction under this paragraph shall not, however, constitute a prohibition under section 6105 (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms and ammunition).* * *Section 8. The definition of "firearm" in section 6102(a) of Title 23 is amended to read:§ 6102. Definitions.(a) General rule.--The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Firearm." Any weapon which is designed to or may readily be converted to expel any projectile by the action of an explosive or the frame or receiver of any such weapon as defined by 18 Pa.C.S. § 6105(i) (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms and ammunition).* * *Section 9. Sections 6107(a), 6108(a)(7)(ii), 6108.3(b)(3)(i)(F) and (ii)(F) and 6119(b) of Title 23 are amended to read:§ 6107. Hearings.20250SB0669PN1276 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) General rule.--Within ten business days of the filing of a petition under this chapter, a hearing shall be held before the court, at which the plaintiff must prove the allegation of abuse by a preponderance of the evidence. The court shall, at the time the defendant is given notice of the hearing, advise the defendant of the right to be represented by counsel, of the right to present evidence, of the right to compel attendance of witnesses, of the method by which witnesses may be compelled, of the possibility that any firearm, other weapon or ammunition owned and any firearm license possessed may be ordered temporarily relinquished, of the options for relinquishment of a firearm pursuant to this chapter, of the possibility that Federal or State law may prohibit the possession of firearms, including an explanation of 18 U.S.C. § 922(g)(8) (relating to unlawful acts) and 18 Pa.C.S. § 6105 (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms and ammunition), and that any protection order granted by a court may be considered in any subsequent proceedings under this title. This notice shall be printed and delivered in a manner which easily attracts attention to its content and shall specify that child custody is one of the proceedings where prior protection orders may be considered.* * *§ 6108. Relief.(a) General rule.--Subject to subsection (a.1), the court may grant any protection order or approve any consent agreement to bring about a cessation of abuse of the plaintiff or minor children. The order or agreement may include:* * *(7) Prohibiting the defendant from acquiring or 20250SB0669PN1276 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 possessing any firearm for the duration of the order, ordering the defendant to temporarily relinquish to the sheriff or the appropriate law enforcement agency any firearms under the defendant's possession or control, and requiring the defendant to relinquish to the sheriff or the appropriate law enforcement agency any firearm license issued under section 6108.3 (relating to relinquishment to third party for safekeeping) or 18 Pa.C.S. § 6106 (relating to firearms not to be carried without a license) or 6109 (relating to licenses) the defendant may possess. The court may also order the defendant to relinquish the defendant's other weapons or ammunition that have been used or been threatened to be used in an incident of abuse against the plaintiff or the minor children. A copy of the court's order shall be transmitted to the chief or head of the appropriate law enforcement agency and to the sheriff of the county of which the defendant is a resident. When relinquishment is ordered, the following shall apply:* * *(ii) The court's order shall contain a list of any firearm, other weapon or ammunition ordered relinquished. Upon the entry of a final order, the defendant shall inform the court in what manner the defendant is going to relinquish any firearm, other weapon or ammunition ordered relinquished. Relinquishment may occur pursuant to section 6108.2 (relating to relinquishment for consignment sale, lawful transfer or safekeeping) or 6108.3 or to the sheriff or the appropriate law enforcement agency pursuant to this paragraph. Where the sheriff or the appropriate law enforcement agency is 20250SB0669PN1276 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 designated, the sheriff or the appropriate law enforcement agency shall secure custody of the defendant's firearms, other weapons or ammunition and any firearm license listed in the court's order for the duration of the order or until otherwise directed by court order. In securing custody of the defendant's relinquished firearms, the sheriff or the appropriate law enforcement agency shall comply with 18 Pa.C.S. § 6105(f)(4) (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms and ammunition). In securing custody of the defendant's other weapons and ammunition, the sheriff or the appropriate law enforcement agency shall provide the defendant with a signed and dated written receipt which shall include a detailed description of the other weapon or ammunition and its condition. The court shall inform the defendant that firearms, other weapons or ammunition shall be deemed abandoned when the conditions under 18 Pa.C.S. § 6128(a) (relating to abandonment of firearms, weapons or ammunition) are satisfied and may then be disposed of in accordance with 18 Pa.C.S. § 6128.* * *§ 6108.3. Relinquishment to third party for safekeeping.* * *(b) Transfer to third party.--* * *(3) (i) A defendant wishing to relinquish firearms, other weapons or ammunition to a third party pursuant to subsection (a) shall, in the presence of the sheriff or the sheriff's designee, execute an affidavit on a form 20250SB0669PN1276 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police which shall include, at a minimum, the following:* * *(F) A plain-language summary of 18 Pa.C.S. § 6105(a.1)(2) and (c)(6) (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms and ammunition).* * *(ii) A third party who will be accepting possession of firearms, other weapons and ammunition pursuant to subsection (a) shall, in the presence of the sheriff or the sheriff's designee, execute an affidavit on a form prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police which shall include, at a minimum, the following:* * *(F) A plain-language summary of 18 Pa.C.S. §§ 6105(a.1)(5) and (c)(6), 6111(c) (relating to sale or transfer of firearms or ammunition) and 6115 (relating to loans on, or lending or giving firearms prohibited).* * *§ 6119. Immunity.* * *(b) Exception.--Law enforcement agencies and their employees, including police officers and sheriffs, shall be liable to the lawful owner of confiscated, seized or relinquished firearms in accordance with 18 Pa.C.S. § 6105(f) (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms and ammunition) and shall be liable to the lawful owner of confiscated, seized or relinquished other 20250SB0669PN1276 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 weapons or ammunition for any loss, damage or substantial decrease in the value of the other weapons or ammunition that is a direct result of a lack of reasonable care by the law enforcement agency or its employees.Section 10. Sections 5552(b)(1), 5802(7) and 6308(d)(1)(i) of Title 42 are amended to read:§ 5552. Other offenses.* * *(b) Major offenses.--A prosecution for any of the following offenses must be commenced within five years after it is committed:(1) Under the following provisions of Title 18 (relating to crimes and offenses):Section 901 (relating to criminal attempt) involving attempt to commit murder where no murder occurs.Section 902 (relating to criminal solicitation) involving solicitation to commit murder where no murder occurs.Section 903 (relating to criminal conspiracy) involving conspiracy to commit murder where no murder occurs.Section 911 (relating to corrupt organizations).Section 2702 (relating to aggravated assault).Section 2706 (relating to terroristic threats).Section 2713 (relating to neglect of care-dependent person).Section 2901 (relating to kidnapping).Section 3301 (relating to arson and related offenses).Section 3502 (relating to burglary).20250SB0669PN1276 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3701 (relating to robbery).Section 3921 (relating to theft by unlawful taking or disposition) through section 3933 (relating to unlawful use of computer).Section 4101 (relating to forgery).Section 4107 (relating to deceptive or fraudulent business practices).Section 4108 (relating to commercial bribery and breach of duty to act disinterestedly).Section 4109 (relating to rigging publicly exhibited contest).Section 4117 (relating to insurance fraud).Section 4701 (relating to bribery in official and political matters) through section 4703 (relating to retaliation for past official action).Section 4902 (relating to perjury) through section 4912 (relating to impersonating a public servant).Section 4952 (relating to intimidation of witnesses or victims).Section 4953 (relating to retaliation against witness, victim or party).Section 5101 (relating to obstructing administration of law or other governmental function).Section 5111 (relating to dealing in proceeds of unlawful activities).Section 5512 (relating to lotteries, etc.) through section 5514 (relating to pool selling and bookmaking).Section 5902(b) (relating to prostitution and related offenses).Section 6111(g)(2) and (4) (relating to sale or 20250SB0669PN1276 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 transfer of firearms or ammunition).* * *§ 5802. Controlled substances forfeiture.The following shall be subject to forfeiture to the Commonwealth and no property right shall exist in them:* * *(7) Any firearms, including, but not limited to, rifles, shotguns, pistols, revolvers, machine guns, zip guns or any type of prohibited offensive weapon, as that term is defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 6105 (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms and ammunition), which are used or intended for use to facilitate a violation of The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act. Firearms as are found in close proximity to illegally possessed controlled substances shall be rebuttably presumed to be used or intended for use to facilitate a violation of The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act. All weapons forfeited under this chapter shall be immediately destroyed by the receiving law enforcement agency.§ 6308. Law enforcement records.* * *(d) Pennsylvania State Police registry.--(1) The contents of law enforcement records and files concerning a child shall not be disclosed to the public except if the child is 14 years of age or older at the time of the alleged conduct and if any of the following apply:(i) The child has been adjudicated delinquent by a court as a result of any offense enumerated in 18 Pa.C.S. § 6105 (relating to persons not to possess, use, 20250SB0669PN1276 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 manufacture, control, sell or transfer firearms and ammunition).* * *Section 11. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20250SB0669PN1276 - 38 - 12345